Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB920.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5702 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5702. Bail to be governed by general rules.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided by this title and the laws relating to the regulation of surety companies, all matters relating to the fixing, posting, forfeiting, exoneration and distribution of bail and recognizances shall be governed by general rules.(b) Use of cash bail.--(1) In a case in which the defendant is the named depositor, any cash bail deposited by the defendant which is otherwise returnable to the defendant shall be held and applied to the payment of any restitution, fees, fines and 12345678910111213141516171819 costs imposed upon the defendant in connection with a criminal or delinquency case unless the defendant shows that the defendant would suffer an undue hardship.(2) In a case in which the defendant is not the named depositor, the court may order, upon motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth, that any cash bail deposited on behalf of the defendant which is otherwise returnable to the depositor be held and applied to the payment of any restitution, fees, fines and costs imposed upon the defendant in connection with a criminal or delinquency case unless the depositor shows that the depositor would suffer an undue hardship.(c) Notice.--Written notice of the provisions of subsection (b) shall be provided to a depositor prior to the acceptance of a deposit of cash bail.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0920PN0969 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516